Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. Qualifications, Selection and Empaneling of Juries

Cross references. —

As to selection of jury at coroner's inquest, see §§

7-4-201

to

7-4-203

.

For provision that trial juries for criminal actions are formed in the same manner as trial juries in civil actions, see §

7-11-101

.

For duty of county clerks to prepare list of qualified jurors, see §

18-3-402

.

As to examination of jurors, see Rule 47, W.R.C.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d Jury §§ 96 to 194.

Religious belief as ground for exemption or excuse from jury service, 2 ALR3d 1392.

Validity of enactment requiring juror to be an elector or voter or have qualifications thereof, 78 ALR3d 1147.

Validity of jury selection as affected by accused's absence from conducting of procedures for selection and impaneling of final jury panel for specific case, 33 ALR4th 429.

Age group underrepresentation in grand jury or petit jury venire, 62 ALR4th 859.

Propriety of inquiry on voir dire as to juror's attitude toward, or acquaintance with literature dealing with, amount of damage awards, 63 ALR5th 285.

Purposeful inclusion of Negroes in grand or petit jury as unconstitutional discrimination, 4 ALR Fed 449.

50 C.J.S. Juries §§ 134 to 175.

§ 1-11-101.
Qualifications of juror.

A person is qualified to act as a juror if he is:

An adult citizen of the United States who has been a resident of the state and of the county ninety (90) days before being selected and returned pursuant to W.S.

1-11-106

;

In possession of his natural faculties, of ordinary intelligence and without mental or physical infirmity preventing satisfactory jury service;

Possessed of sufficient knowledge of the English language.

No citizen shall be excluded from service as a juror on account of race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin or economic status.

The court shall discharge a person from serving as a juror if the person is not qualified to act as a juror under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 23, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3340; Laws 1903, ch. 4, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 978; C.S. 1920, § 1204; R.S. 1931, § 61-201; C.S. 1945, § 12-101; Laws 1949, ch. 61, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-77; Laws 1969, ch. 16, § 1; 1973, ch. 213, § 2; ch. 227, § 2; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 2; 2019 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to equal protection, see art. 1, § 2, Wyo. Const.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “qualified” for “competent”; in (a)(i), added “pursuant to W.S.

1-11-106

”; and added (c).

Mental incompetency of juror not shown. —

Trial court did not err by denying defendant a new trial based on a juror's alleged mental incompetency because it could have concluded that defendant's showing fell short of raising any significant concern under this section. Defendant relied on a few jurors' nonspecific comments to the bailiff indicating that they could not understand the point of some of the juror's statements made during their deliberations, his own statements to the bailiff, and the district judge's observations. Moore v. State, 2013 WY 120, 309 P.3d 1242,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2013).

Constitutionality of permitting women to serve as jurors. —

The clause in art. 1, § 9, Wyo. Const., in which the word “men” appeared was not inserted for the purpose of preventing the legislature from changing the statutes in effect in regard to the persons competent for jury service. The legislature was therefore entitled to enact ch. 61, Laws 1949, duly incorporated in this section, which permitted women to serve as petit jurors in criminal and civil cases in the district court. Such act did not violate the constitutional provision. State v. Yazzie, 67 Wyo. 256, 218 P.2d 482,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1950).

Exclusion of women from jury on criminal prosecution of man

did not deprive the accused of rights, privileges and immunities accorded him by amend. 14, McKinney v. State, 3 Wyo. 719, 30 P. 293,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1892).

Residency. —

“Selected and returned,” as used in this section, relates to the preparation of the base jury list, which is the list of qualified jurors; because “selected and returned” is a reference to preparation of the base jury list, the critical date for measuring the duration of a prospective juror's residence in a county is April 1, the date on which the base jury list is certified. In other words, any juror who is a resident of a county for the ninety-day period preceding April 1 meets the residence qualification for service in that county; therefore, even though a juror was no longer a resident of the county, she was still qualified because she was a resident of the county in the 90-day period preceding April 1. Lake v. State, 292 P.3d 174,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2013).

Racial discrimination. —

See Lofton v. State, 489 P.2d 1169,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 260

(Wyo. 1971), cert. denied, 406 U.S. 949, 92 S. Ct. 2049, 32 L. Ed. 2d 337, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 2587 (U.S. 1972).

Showing of prejudice unnecessary where substantial noncompliance
with section. —

Where there was substantial noncompliance with provisions of this section in selecting jury list and panel in trial court, defendant was not required to show prejudice before his motions to quash the jury list, to quash the panel of jurors summoned and for a directed verdict were sustained. State v. Dobbs, 70 Wyo. 26, 244 P.2d 280,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1952).

Cited

in

Gunnell v. State, 21 Wyo. 125, 128 P. 512,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1912); Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Americans with Disabilities Act: An Introduction for Lawyers and Judges,” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 175 (1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Deafness of juror as ground for impeaching verdict, 15 ALR2d 534.

Validity of enactment requiring juror to be an elector or voter or have qualifications thereof, 78 ALR3d 1147.

Religious belief, affiliation or prejudice of prospective juror as proper subject of inquiry or ground for challenge on voir dire, 95 ALR3d 172.

Deafness of juror as ground for impeaching verdict, or securing new trial or reversal on appeal, 38 ALR4th 1170.

Jury: visual impairment as disqualification, 48 ALR4th 1154.

Prejudical effect of juror's inability to comprehend English, 117 ALR5th 1.

§ 1-11-102.
Convicted felon disqualified.

A person who has been
convicted of any felony is disqualified to act as a juror unless his
conviction is reversed or annulled, he receives a pardon or his rights
are restored pursuant to W.S. 7-13-105(a).

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3341; C.S. 1910, § 979; C.S. 1920, § 1205; R.S. 1931, § 61-202; C.S. 1945, § 12-102; W.S. 1957, § 1-78; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1998, ch. 89, § 1; 2003, ch. 132, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision that religion is no disqualification, see art. 1, § 18, Wyo. Const.

For provision that pardon restores eligibility to be a juror, see §

6-10-106

.

Section does not render convicted felon ipso facto incompetent

to serve as a juror. Vivion v. Brittain, 510 P.2d 21,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1973).

Objection to qualification of juror waived. —

Where there is nothing in the record to show that any member of the jury was ever asked any question which would elicit from them any answer as to their statutory jury qualifications under this section, any objection to the qualification of a juror because of his previous felony conviction is waived. Vivion v. Brittain, 510 P.2d 21,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1973).

Quoted

in

Blake v. Rupe, 651 P.2d 1096,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Meldrum v. State, 23 Wyo. 12, 146 P. 596,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1915).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Disqualification or exemption of juror for conviction of, or prosecution for, criminal offense, 75 ALR5th 295.

§ 1-11-103.
Persons exempt as juror; duty to discharge.

A person is exempt from jury service if the person is:

A salaried and active member of an organized fire department or an active member of a police department of a city, town or law enforcement agency of the county or state;

An elected public official;

An active duty member of the Wyoming national guard; or

A person exempt under federal law or regulation, including an active duty member of the armed forces when service on a jury would unreasonably interfere with his performance of military duties or adversely affect the readiness of his unit, command or activity pursuant to 32 C.F.R. Part 144.

The court shall discharge a person from serving as a trial juror for the jury term in which he is summoned if it satisfactorily appears that the person is exempt and specifically claims the benefit of the exemption under W.S.

1-11-105

.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 3342; C.S. 1910, § 980; C.S. 1920, § 1206; R.S. 1931, § 61-203; C.S. 1945, § 12-103; W.S. 1957, § 1-79; Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 79; 1975, ch. 139, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2019 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to exemption from jury duty of active members of the National Guard, see §

19-9-401

.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “jury service” for “liability to act as juror” and deleted “court finds that the provisions of W.S.

1-11-104

apply or for any other compelling reasons or if a”; added (a)(iii) and (a)(iv), and made related changes; and in (b), added “for the jury term in which he is summoned” and “under W.S.

1-11-105

,” and deleted “not competent or the person is.”

Constitutionality of excluding women. —

See same catchline in notes under §

1-11-104

.

When presented. —

Cause for exemption must be presented and a favorable ruling by the court given before the right accrues. Meldrum v. State, 23 Wyo. 12, 146 P. 596,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1915).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Police officers or other law enforcement officers as jurors in criminal cases, 72 ALR3d 895.

Former law enforcement officers as qualified jurors in criminal cases, 72 ALR3d 958.

Jury: who is lawyer or attorney disqualified or exempt from service, or subject to challenge for cause, 57 ALR4th 1260.

§ 1-11-104.
Causes for excusal.

A juror may not be excused for a trivial cause or for hardship or inconvenience to his business, but only when material injury or destruction to his property or property entrusted to him is threatened, or when his health or the sickness or death of a member of his family requires his absence. A person who has attained the age of seventy-two (72) years may be excused at his request. A person may be excused from jury duty when the care of that person’s young children requires his absence. Any person who has served on a jury during a jury term shall, upon request, be excused from further jury service in that court for the remainder of that jury term and in the discretion of the court may be excused from jury service for the following jury term.

For the purposes of this section:

A person has served on a jury during a jury term when he is summoned to serve and he has been selected as a juror in any court within the judicial district and has taken the oath required under W.S.

1-11-201

;

A person has not served on a jury during a jury term if he is disqualified for that jury term pursuant to W.S.

1-11-102

or is discharged for that jury term pursuant to W.S.

1-11-103

.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 3343; C.S. 1910, § 981; C.S. 1920, § 1207; R.S. 1931, § 61-204; C.S. 1945, § 12-104; Laws 1949, ch. 61, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 1-80; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 2; 1989, ch. 44, § 1; 2019 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 64, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a); in (a), added “who has attained the age of seventy-two (72) years,” deleted “if he is over seventy-two (72) years of age,” added a period to the end of the second sentence, and added “during a jury term” to the beginning of the fourth sentence; and added (b).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b)(i) substituted “he has been selected as a juror in any court within the judicial district and has taken the oath required under W.S.

1-11-201

” for “he has complied with the summons.”

Provision of earlier statute. —

Section 2, ch. 47, Laws 1888, read: “Any person may be excused from serving on a jury, when it shall appear to the court that the interests of such juror, or those of the public, will be materially injured by his attendance.”

Constitutionality of excluding women. —

Exclusion of women from jury on criminal prosecution of a man did not deprive the accused of rights, privileges and immunities accorded him by amend. 14, U.S. Const.McKinney v. State, 3 Wyo. 719, 30 P. 293,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1892).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Proof as to exclusion of or discrimination against eligible class or race in respect to jury in criminal case, 1 ALR2d 1291.

Exclusion of women from grand or trial jury or jury panel in criminal case as violation of constitutional rights of accused or as ground for reversal of conviction — state cases, 70 ALR5th 587.

§ 1-11-105.
Exemption affidavit required; failure to file.

If a person exempt from jury duty is summoned as a juror, he may submit a declaration under penalty of perjury stating his purported grounds for exemption. If the court determines that the declaration sufficiently demonstrates that the person is not required to serve as a juror pursuant to W.S. 1-11-103(a), the court shall discharge the person from serving as a trial juror for the jury term in which he was summoned. A person who is discharged under this section is not required to appear in court. Failure of any person who is exempt to submit a declaration under penalty of perjury is a waiver of his exemption, and he is required to appear upon the day for which the jury is summoned and serve as a juror the same as if he were not entitled to exemption unless otherwise excused by the court.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 3344; C.S. 1910, § 982; C.S. 1920, § 1208; R.S. 1931, § 61-205; C.S. 1945, § 12-105; W.S. 1957, § 1-81; Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 80; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2019 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 64, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
substituted “If the court determines that the affidavit sufficiently demonstrates that the person is not required to serve as a juror pursuant to W.S. 1-11-103(a), the court shall discharge the person from serving as a trial juror for the jury term in which he was summoned. A person who is discharged under this section is not required to appear in court.” for “The affidavit must be delivered by the clerk to the judge of the court where the person is summoned, and if sufficient in substance, must be received as evidence of his right to exemption and as an excuse for nonattendance in person. The affidavit must then be filed by the clerk.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “he may submit a declaration under penalty of perjury” for “he may file his affidavit with the clerk of the court for which he is summoned,” “his purported grounds for exemption” for “his office, occupation or employment,” “declaration sufficiently” for “affidavit sufficiently,” and “submit a declaration under penalty of perjury” for “file the affidavit” and added “unless otherwise excused by the court” at the end.

§ 1-11-106.
Jury lists; preparation of base jury lists; selecting jury panel; certificate and summons.

The list of persons selected to serve as prospective trial jurors, compiled pursuant to W.S.

1-11-129

, is the base jury list for the district court and the circuit court for the jury term set by each court.

The clerk shall prepare a certificate containing the names constituting the base jury list, and summon them to serve as jurors for the jury term for which they have been selected.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 3348; C.S. 1910, § 987; C.S. 1920, § 1212; R.S. 1931, § 61-209; C.S. 1945, § 12-109; W.S. 1957, § 1-85; Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 81; 1975, ch. 67, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 2; 1989, ch. 44, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2010, ch. 34, § 1; 2014 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), deleted “and justice of the peace courts” following “the circuit court,” “or justice of the peace” preceding “for their respective courts”; and made related changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2010 amendment,

in the first sentence of (a), deleted “certified and delivered to the clerk of the district court in accordance with W.S.

18-3-402

or a list of persons” following “serve as trial jurors,” and deleted “under an alternate procedure” preceding “pursuant to W.S.

1-11-129

.”

Laws 2010, ch. 34 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2010.

The 2014 amendment

, effective July 1, 2014, in (a), deleted the former second and third sentences, which read: “By order of the district judge or circuit judge, for their respective courts, the base jury list may be expanded by including some other source or sources of names in addition to voter lists. After the list is delivered and supplemented when applicable, suitable ballots shall be prepared and deposited in a box known as and plainly marked “jury box number one”; in the next-to-last sentence, substituted “shall select a panel of prospective trial jurors from the base jury list for the county” for “sheriff and county treasurer shall draw from jury box number one a panel of trial jurors, which shall contain such”; in the last sentence, added “The clerk shall select the,” and substituted “prospective jurors” for “names.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
in (a), substituted “selected” for “qualified,” added “prospective” and substituted “for the jury term set by each” for “from April 1 of the year in which the list is certified and delivered through March 31 of the following year. Upon order of the court, the clerk of the district court shall select a panel of prospective trial jurors from the base jury list for the county. The clerk shall select the number of prospective jurors as specified by the”; in (b), substituted “base jury list,” for “panel of trial jurors” and substituted “serve as jurors for the jury term for which they have been selected” for “appear in court for a trial whenever ordered by the court.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2014, ch. 53, section 3, provides: “Notwithstanding
W.S. 8 -1-107, the provisions of this act shall apply to all actions pending on the effective date of this act for which a jury has not been empaneled and all actions filed thereafter.”

Residency. —

“Selected and returned,” as used in this section, relates to the preparation of the base jury list, which is the list of qualified jurors; because “selected and returned” is a reference to preparation of the base jury list, the critical date for measuring the duration of a prospective juror's residence in a county is April 1, the date on which the base jury list is certified. In other words, any juror who is a resident of a county for the ninety-day period preceding April 1 meets the residence qualification for service in that county; therefore, even though a juror was no longer a resident of the county, she was still qualified because she was a resident of the county in the 90-day period preceding April 1. Lake v. State, 292 P.3d 174,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2013).

Duty of clerk purely ministerial. —

The duty of the clerk to prepare jury list and place names in the boxes according to this section and §

1-11-109

is purely ministerial, and the clerk should not, on theory that they were disqualified, omit some of the names. Meldrum v. State, 23 Wyo. 12, 146 P. 596,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1915).

Applied

in

State v. Dobbs, 70 Wyo. 26, 244 P.2d 280,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1952); Dorador v. State, 573 P.2d 839,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Bloomer v. State, 2009 WY 77, 209 P.3d 574,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(June 12, 2009).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Inclusion or exclusion of first and last days in computing time for jury drawing or furnishing of jury list which must take place a certain number of days before a known future date, 98 ALR2d 1331.

Validity of requirement or practice of selecting prospective jurors exclusively from list of registered voters, 80 ALR3d 869.

§ 1-11-107.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 3348; C.S. 1910, § 987; C.S. 1920, § 1212; R.S. 1931, § 61-209; C.S. 1945, § 12-110; W.S. 1957, § 1-86; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 53, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 10, related to depositing new ballots in jury box.

§ 1-11-108.
Jury panel
in circuit courts; functions, powers and duties of judges thereof.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 53, § 2.

In conducting jury trials, judges of the circuit courts shall exercise and perform the same functions, powers and duties as are prescribed for both the judge and the clerk of the district court in W.S.

1-11-101

through

1-11-401

, insofar as practicable.

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 138, § 3.

History:

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 82; W.S. 1957, § 1-86.1; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 3; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2014 ch. 53, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “circuit courts” for “justice of the peace and county courts”; and, in (b), substituted “circuit courts” for “county courts and justice of peace courts.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, repealed former (a), which read: “The names in jury box number one in the
office of the clerk of the district court is the panel of trial jurors
in all circuit courts.”

Severability. —

Section 73, ch. 261, Laws 1971, reads: “If any provision or clause of this act or application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect without invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared severable.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 76, ch. 261, Laws 1971, reads: “All acts and parts of acts inconsistent with this act are hereby repealed to the extent of such inconsistency.”

§ 1-11-109.
Procedure for selecting jury; contents of certificate; summons.

The clerk shall choose the prospective jurors from the base jury list using a random method of selection.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 53, § 2.

If any person selected is not qualified to serve as a trial juror, the name of the person shall be stricken from the base jury list from which summoned. If any person selected is exempt from serving as a trial juror under W.S. 1-11-103(a) and the person has claimed the exemption under W.S.

1-11-105

, then the name of the person shall be stricken from the base jury list for the jury term from which summoned.

When the necessary number of jurors has been randomly selected, the clerk shall make and certify a list of the names selected. The certificate shall state:

The date of the court order for the selection;

The date of the selection;

The number of jurors selected;

The names and addresses of the competent jurors; and

The place where the jurors are required to appear.

The jurors on the certified list shall be summoned to appear.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 15; R.S. 1899, § 3353; C.S. 1910, § 992; C.S. 1920, § 1217; R.S. 1931, § 61-214; C.S. 1945, § 12-115; W.S. 1957, § 1-91; Laws 1963, ch. 74, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 2; 2014 ch. 53, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, rewrote (a); repealed former (b) which read: “The name on each ballot drawn shall be entered in the minutes of the court”; in (c), substituted “If any person selected” for “If the name of any person is drawn who,” deleted “the ballot containing the name shall be destroyed, and such fact shall be entered in the minutes of the court”; and in (d), substituted “has been randomly selected” for “has been drawn,” and “selected” for “drawn” or variations throughout.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (c), substituted “qualified” for “competent,” deleted “and the incompetence shall be made to appear to the satisfaction of the court,” and added “base” and “from which summoned” in the first sentence, added the second sentence; and in (d)(v), deleted “time and.”

Residency. —

“Selected and returned,” as used in this section, relates to the preparation of the base jury list, which is the list of qualified jurors; because “selected and returned” is a reference to preparation of the base jury list, the critical date for measuring the duration of a prospective juror's residence in a county is April 1, the date on which the base jury list is certified. In other words, any juror who is a resident of a county for the ninety-day period preceding April 1 meets the residence qualification for service in that county; therefore, even though a juror was no longer a resident of the county, she was still qualified because she was a resident of the county in the 90-day period preceding April 1. Lake v. State, 292 P.3d 174,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2013).

Defendant failed to show that the jury selection process warranted
the granting of his motion to quash the jury panel. —

Defendant's convictions for possession of methamphetamine with intent to deliver were proper because the district court did not err in denying defendant's motion to quash the jury panel; the motion was based upon the district court clerk's policy of selecting jurors from the master list in alphabetical order, rather than in a random selection process. Defendant failed to show that the method used deprived him of a fair cross section of the community or that any distinctive group was systematically excluded from the panel; however, that method was also not to be used in any future cases.
Bloomer v. State, 2009 WY 77, 209 P.3d 574,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2009).

Cited

in

Meldrum v. State, 23 Wyo. 12, 146 P. 596,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1915).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Confusion of name or identity in drawing, summoning, calling or impaneling, juror in civil case, as affecting verdict, 89 ALR2d 1242.

§§ 1-11-110 and 1-11-111.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 138, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1899, ch. 23, §§ 17 and 18, related to disposition of ballots after term, and a jury box for jurors residing within five miles, respectively.

§ 1-11-112.
Jurors to appear at time specified.

Each grand juror and petit juror summoned shall appear before the court on the day and at the hour specified by the court, and depart only with permission of the court.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 47, § 14; R.S. 1899, § 3355; C.S. 1910, § 994; C.S. 1920, § 1219; R.S. 1931, § 61-216; C.S. 1945, § 12-117; W.S. 1957, § 1-95; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2019 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “by the court” for “in the summons.”

§ 1-11-113.
Completion of jury panel.

The persons summoned by the clerk shall appear in answer to the summons and be examined as to their qualifications. If after all qualified trial jurors have been accepted it appears that there are not enough in attendance, the court shall order the clerk to randomly select the necessary number of names from the base jury list to complete the jury panel, and the clerk shall continue to randomly select names until a sufficient number of jurors are obtained. The persons so selected shall be summoned to appear.

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 138, § 3.

History:

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 19; R.S. 1899, § 3358; C.S. 1910, § 997; C.S. 1920, § 1222; R.S. 1931, § 61-219; C.S. 1945, § 12-120; W.S. 1957, § 1-96; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, §§ 2, 3; 2014 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a), substituted “summoned by the clerk” for “drawn from jury box number one and certified as trial jurors” in the first sentence “randomly select” for “draw from jury box number one” or variant and inserted “from the base jury list” in the second sentence; and substituted “selected” for drawn” in the third sentence.

Constitutionality. —

This section does not violate the provisions of Wyo. Const., art. 1, § 10. State v. Bolln, 10 Wyo. 439, 70 P. 1,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1902).

Waiver of irregularity. —

When jury is sworn, accused waives all irregularities in the selection of the panel. Delmont v. State, 15 Wyo. 271, 88 P. 623,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 15 Wyo. 271, 88 P. 623,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1907).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Absence of defendant during taking of steps toward impaneling or selecting jury, 26 ALR2d 762.

Religious belief, affiliation or prejudice of prospective juror as proper subject of inquiry or ground for challenge on voir dire, 95 ALR3d 172.

§ 1-11-114.
Service of summons; proof of service.

Service of a summons may be made by such means as the court may order. If service is accomplished through the sheriff’s office, the sheriff’s costs shall be paid by the county.

If necessary the court may require proof of service.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 3360; C.S. 1910, § 999; C.S. 1920, § 1224; R.S. 1931, § 61-221; C.S. 1945, § 12-122; W.S. 1957, § 1-98; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; Laws 1983, ch. 138, § 2; 1985, ch. 13, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to proof of service, see Rule 4(m)(2), W.R.C.P.

Motion to quash venire

selected by the sheriff on ground of interest of sheriff in the prosecution held properly denied where the affidavit merely avers that the sheriff is interested and would be incompetent to serve as juror on account of his bias and prejudice. Gunnell v. State, 21 Wyo. 125, 128 P. 512,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1912).

Cited

in

State v. Bolln, 10 Wyo. 439, 70 P. 1,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1902).

§ 1-11-115.
Failure of juror to attend.

Any juror summoned who
willfully and without reasonable excuse fails to attend may be arrested
and compelled to attend and is subject to contempt of court.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 22; R.S. 1899, § 3361; C.S. 1910, § 1000; C.S. 1920, § 1225; R.S. 1931, § 61-222; C.S. 1945, § 12-123; W.S. 1957, § 1-99; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1989, ch. 208, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Holding jurors in contempt under state law, 93 ALR5th 493.

§ 1-11-116.
Empaneling of jury.

At the opening of court on the day that trial jurors are summoned and notified to appear, the clerk shall call the names of those jurors notified to appear. The court shall hear the jurors who are present, and shall excuse those whom the court finds are exempt, disqualified or have material cause for being excused.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 23; R.S. 1899, § 3362; C.S. 1910, § 1001; C.S. 1920, § 1226; R.S. 1931, § 61-223; C.S. 1945, § 12-124; W.S. 1957, § 1-100; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 2; 2014 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2014 amendment,

deleted the former second and third sentences.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added “and notified” and substituted “jurors notified to appear” for “summoned” in the first sentence and substituted “who are present” for “summoned” in the second sentence.

Cited

in

State v. Bolln, 10 Wyo. 439, 70 P. 1,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1902).

§ 1-11-117.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1899, ch. 23, §§ 24, 25; R.S. 1899, §§ 3363, 3364; C.S. 1910, §§ 1002, 1003; C.S. 1920, §§ 1227, 1228; R.S. 1931, §§ 61-224, 61-225; C.S. 1945, §§ 12-125, 12-126; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-101, 1-102; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 2; repealed by 2014 ch. 53, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1899, ch. 23,
§§ 24, 25, related to drawing trial jury.

§ 1-11-118.
Procedure upon exhaustion of prospective jurors during empaneling.

If at any time during the empaneling of a jury all the names selected for the panel are exhausted, the court shall enter an order directing that such additional number of names as necessary be randomly selected from the base jury list. The court may excuse any jurors so selected if it appears that, because of distance, the delay occasioned by notifying the juror and requiring his presence would unduly prolong empaneling the trial jury. The clerk shall notify the persons selected and not excused to appear in court immediately. The process shall continue from time to time when necessary until a jury is obtained.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 26; R.S. 1899, § 3365; C.S. 1910, § 1004; C.S. 1920, § 1229; R.S. 1931, § 61-226; C.S. 1945, § 12-127; W.S. 1957, § 1-103; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 2; 2014 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2014 amendment,

substituted “the names selected for the panel” for “the ballots contained in box number two,” inserted “additional” following “that such”, and substituted “be randomly selected from the base jury list” for “be drawn from box number one” in the first sentence; substituted “so selected” for “so drawn” in the second sentence; substituted “shall summon the persons selected and not excused” for “shall forthwith summon the persons drawn” in the third sentence; and deleted the former fourth sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “notifying” for “summoning” in the second sentence and “notify” for “summon” in the third sentence.

§ 1-11-119.
Number of jurors; fees and mileage.

Trial juries in circuit
courts shall be composed of six (6) persons. Trial juries in civil
cases and all other proceedings in the district courts except criminal
cases shall be composed of six (6) jurors unless one (1) of the parties
to the action files a written demand for twelve (12) jurors within
the time a demand for jury may be filed, in which event the number
of jurors shall be twelve (12). Jurors in all courts shall be allowed
the same fees and mileage as jurors in district court.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-103.1; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to mileage of jurors in district court, see §

1-11-302

.

As to amount of fees of jurors in district courts, see §

1-11-303

.

As to number of persons on jury, see art. 1, § 9, Wyo. Const.

For provision allowing parties to stipulate a jury of less than 12 members or to agree to accept a majority verdict, see Rule 48, W.R.C.P.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit courts” for “justice of the peace and county courts.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Quoted

in

Vivion v. Brittain, 510 P.2d 21,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1973).

Cited

in

KAA v. State, 2001 WY 24, 18 P.3d 1159,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

See comment, “The Wyoming Juvenile Court Act of 1971,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 237 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Statute reducing number of jurors as violative of right to trial by jury, 47 ALR3d 895.

Validity of agreement, by stipulation or waiver in state civil case, to accept verdict by number or proportion of jurors less than that constitutionally permitted, 15 ALR4th 213.

Right to jury trial in action under state civil rights law, 12 ALR5th 508.

§ 1-11-120.
Persons sworn to constitute jury; generally.

The first six (6) persons, or other number of persons designated for a jury under W.S.

1-11-119

, who appear as their names are randomly selected and are approved as indifferent between the parties and not discharged or excused shall be sworn and constitute the jury to try the issue.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 27; R.S. 1899, § 3366; C.S. 1910, § 1005; C.S. 1920, § 1230; R.S. 1931, § 61-227; C.S. 1945, § 12-128; W.S. 1957, § 1-104; Laws 1971, ch. 168, § 2; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2014 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2014 amendment,

substituted “are randomly selected” for “are drawn.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
substituted "other number of persons designated for a jury under W.S.

1-11-119

," for "twelve (12) if demanded".

§ 1-11-121.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 28; R.S. 1899, § 3367; C.S. 1910, § 1006; C.S. 1920, § 1231; R.S. 1931, § 61-228; C.S. 1945, § 12-129; W.S. 1957, § 1-105; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 2; repealed by 2014 ch. 53, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 28, related to persons sworn to constitute jury..

§ 1-11-122.
Discharge of jurors.

After the jury is discharged
the jurors, upon request, shall be excused from jury service for the
remainder of the calendar year.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 29; R.S. 1899, § 3368; Laws 1903, ch. 65, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1007; C.S. 1920, § 1232; R.S. 1931, § 61-229; C.S. 1945, § 12-130; W.S. 1957, § 1-106; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 2.

§ 1-11-123.
Discharge of jurors; absent or excused jurors.

The name of a juror who is absent when his name is selected, or is set aside, or excused from serving on that trial shall remain on the base jury list.

History:

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 30; R.S. 1899, § 3369; C.S. 1910, § 1008; C.S. 1920, § 1233; R.S. 1931, § 61-230; C.S. 1945, § 12-131; W.S. 1957, § 1-107; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2014 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

deleted “ballot containing the” preceding “name of”; and substituted “selected” for “drawn” and “remain on the base jury list” for “be returned to the box containing the undrawn ballots as soon as the jury is sworn.”

§ 1-11-124.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 31; R.S. 1899, § 3370; C.S. 1910, § 1009; C.S. 1920, § 1234; R.S. 1931, § 61-231; C.S. 1945, § 12-132; W.S. 1957, § 1-108; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 2; repealed by 2014 ch. 53, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1899, ch. 23,
§ 31, related to procedure where additional jury needed.